Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4001
Act, how cited.

Sections 29-4001 to 29-4014 shall be known and may be cited
as the Sex Offender Registration Act.

Laws 1996, LB 645, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 17;

Laws 2009, LB97, § 23.

Use of a stakeholder group to determine the cutoff points for the three risk levels under the Sex Offender Registration Act does not render the risk assessment instrument arbitrary. Lein v. Nesbitt, 269 Neb. 109, 690 N.W.2d 799 (2005).

The duty to register as a sex offender under Nebraska's Sex Offender Registration Act is collateral to a defendant's sentence on the underlying conviction. A trial court is not required to inform a defendant of the collateral consequence of his or her duty to register as a sex offender under Nebraska's Sex Offender Registration Act before accepting a plea of guilty or no contest, and such pleas are not rendered involuntary or unintelligent because the defendant was not aware of this requirement. State v. Schneider, 263 Neb. 318, 640 N.W.2d 8 (2002).